Utah statutes.
78B-5-204.   Judgment against sheriff -- When conclusive against sureties on
indemnity bond.
If an action is brought against a sheriff for an act done by virtue of his
office and he gives written notice to the sureties on any bond of indemnity
received by him, the judgment recovered is conclusive evidence of his right to
recover against such sureties.  The court may, on motion, and upon five days
notice, order judgment to be entered against them for the amount recovered,
including costs.
